Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1169.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 201.2. Public Meetings on Proposed Ballot Questions.-- Each member of the General Assembly shall conduct a public meeting within the member's respective legislative district for the purpose of receiving public comment on a proposed constitutional amendment or other Statewide ballot 12345678910111213141516171819202122 question. The public meeting shall comply with the following:(1) For a ballot question proposing a constitutional amendment, the public meeting shall be held within eight months after the publication of the notice required under Article XI of the Constitution of Pennsylvania following the first passage of the proposed constitutional amendment by the General Assembly.(2) For any other Statewide ballot question, the public meeting shall be held after the preparation of the statement in plain English under section 201.1, but before the submission of the Statewide ballot question to the electors of the Commonwealth in referendum.(3) The public meeting shall be conducted in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1169PN1306 - 2 - 1234567891011121314